Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-437
Uniformity of interpretation.

The Uniform Controlled Substances Act shall be so applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among those states which enact it.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 97;

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 16.